Hawaii statutes.
§489D-16 Money laundering reports. (a)
Every licensee and its authorized delegates shall file with the commissioner
all reports relating to transactions in the State, as required by federal
recordkeeping and reporting requirements in title 31 United States Code section
5311 et seq., 31 Code of Federal Regulations part 1022, section 1022.210, and
other federal and state laws pertaining to money laundering.

(b) The timely filing of a complete and
accurate report with the appropriate federal agency shall satisfy the
requirements of subsection (a), unless the commissioner notifies the licensee
that reports of this type are not being regularly and comprehensively
transmitted by the federal agency. [L 2006, c 153, pt of §1; am L 2013, c 167, §11]

Previous
Vol11_Ch0476-0490
Next